da: Justerbarhed af cajon-snarer: Ikke-justerbar; On/off og spænding kan justeres; Kun on/off for seiding; Seidingspænding kan justeres; Andet
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh dây snare của Cajon: Không thể điều chỉnh; Bật/tắt và điều chỉnh độ căng; Chỉ bật/tắt snare; Độ căng snare có thể điều chỉnh; Khác
pl: Regulacja sprężyn cajonu: Nieregulowany; Włączanie/wyłączanie i regulacja naciągu; Tylko włączanie/wyłączanie sprężyn; Regulacja naciągu sprężyn; Inne
el: Ρυθμιζόμενη δυνατότητα ταμπούρου cajon: Μη ρυθμιζόμενο; Ενεργοποίηση/απενεργοποίηση και ρυθμιζόμενη τάση; Μόνο ενεργοποίηση/απενεργοποίηση snare; Ρυθμιζόμενη τάση snare; Άλλο
lt-LT: Cajon snare reguliavimas: Nereguliuojamas; Įjungimo / išjungimo ir įtempimo reguliavimas; Tik įjungimas / išjungimas; Spyruoklių įtempimo reguliavimas; Kita
es: Ajuste de la bordonera del cajón: No ajustable; Encendido/apagado y tensión ajustable; Solo encendido/apagado de bordonera; Tensión de bordonera ajustable; Otro
pt-BR: Ajuste da caixa do cajon: Não ajustável; Liga/desliga e tensão ajustável; Apenas liga/desliga da esteira; Tensão da esteira ajustável; Outro
bg-BG: Регулируемост на снър механизма на кахона: Нерегулируемо; Вкл./изкл. и регулируемо обтягане; Само вкл./изкл. на пружините; Регулируемо обтягане на пружините; Други
it: Regolabilità del rullante del cajón: Non regolabile; On/off e tensione regolabile; Solo cordiera on/off; Tensione della cordiera regolabile; Altro
ro-RO: Reglarea efectului snare al cajonului: Neajustabil; Activare/dezactivare și tensiune ajustabilă; Doar activare/dezactivare premier; Tensiune premier ajustabilă; Altele
tr: Cajon trampet ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanamaz; Açma/kapama ve gerginlik ayarlanabilir; Sadece trampet açma/kapama; Trampet gerginliği ayarlanabilir; Diğer
en: Cajon snare adjustability: Not adjustable; On/off and tension adjustable; Snare on/off only; Snare tension adjustable; Other
cs: Nastavitelnost virblu cajonu: Nenastavitelný; Zapnuto/vypnuto a nastavitelné napětí; Pouze zapnutí/vypnutí struníku; Nastavitelné napnutí struníku; Jiný
sv: Justerbarhet för cajonvirveltrumma: Ej justerbar; På/av och justerbar spänning; Sejare endast på/av; Justerbar sejarspänning; Övrigt
hr-HR: Podesivost doboša cajona: Nije prilagodljivo; Uključivanje/isključivanje i prilagodljiva napetost; Mrežica samo uključivanje/isključivanje; Prilagodljiva napetost mrežice; Ostalo
ja: カホンスネアの調整機能: 調整不可; オン/オフおよびテンション調整可能; スネアのオン/オフのみ; スネアテンション調整可能; その他
pt-PT: Ajuste da caixa do cajon: Não ajustável; Ligado/desligado e tensão ajustável; Apenas esteira ligada/desligada; Tensão da esteira ajustável; Outro
nl: Cajon snare verstelbaarheid: Niet verstelbaar; Aan/uit en spanning verstelbaar; Alleen snare aan/uit; Snarespanning verstelbaar; Overig
fr: Réglage du timbre du cajón: Non réglable; On/off et tension réglable; Timbre on/off uniquement; Tension de timbre réglable; Autre
hu: Cajón pergőhatásának állíthatósága: Nem állítható; Be-/kikapcsolható és állítható feszességű; Csak be-/kikapcsolható sodrony; Állítható feszességű sodrony; Egyéb
nb: Justerbarhet av Cajon-skarphet: Ikke justerbar; Av/på og justerbar stramming; Kun seiding av/på; Justerbar seidingstramming; Annet
de: Einstellbarkeit des Cajón-Snares: Nicht einstellbar; Ein/Aus und Spannung einstellbar; Nur Snare Ein/Aus; Snare-Spannung einstellbar; Sonstige
sl-SI: Nastavljivost sistema snare cajona: Ni prilagodljivo; Vklop/izklop in prilagodljiva napetost; Samo vklop/izklop strunika; Prilagodljiva napetost strunika; Drugo
sk-SK: Nastaviteľnosť malého bubna cajonu: Nenastaviteľné; Zapínanie/vypínanie a nastavenie napnutia; Iba zapínanie/vypínanie strunníka; Nastaviteľné napnutie strunníka; Iné
ko: 카혼 스네어 조절 기능: 조정 불가; 켜기/끄기 및 장력 조정 가능; 스네어 켜기/끄기 전용; 스네어 장력 조정 가능; 기타
zh-CN: 卡洪鼓响弦可调性: 不可调; 开关与张力均可调; 仅响弦开关可调; 响弦张力可调; 其他
ru: Регулировка снейр-системы кахона: Нерегулируемый; Вкл./выкл. и регулировка натяжения; Только вкл./выкл. подструнника; Регулировка натяжения подструнника; Другое
fi: Cajon-virvelin säädettävyys: Ei säädettävissä; Päälle/pois ja säädettävä kireys; Vain matto päälle/pois; Maton kireys säädettävissä; Muu
th: ความสามารถในการปรับระดับสแนร์ของคาฮอง: ปรับไม่ได้; เปิด/ปิดและปรับความตึงได้; เปิด/ปิดสแนร์เท่านั้น; ปรับความตึงสแนร์ได้; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 木箱鼓響線可調節性: 不可調; 開關與張力可調; 僅響弦開關; 響弦張力可調; 其他